Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 529.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting human trafficking when the person intentionally:
(a) Benefits financially or receives anything of value from knowing participation
in human trafficking; or
(b) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, obtains, advertises, maintains,
patronizes, or solicits by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor,
transport, provide, obtain, advertise, maintain, patronize, or solicit by any
means, another person, knowing that the person will be subject to human
trafficking.
(2) Promoting human trafficking is a Class B[C] felony unless a victim of the
trafficking is under eighteen (18), in which case it is a Class A[B] felony.
Page 1 of 1
BR005800.100 - 58 - XXXX 1/28/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed